src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
!! Proper noun inflection
!! ----------------------
!! The Estonian language proper nouns inflect in the same cases as regular
!! nouns, but with a colon (':') as separator.

LEXICON Prop-tartu
+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: K ;

LEXICON ProperNounCases
+N+Prop:%:   Cases  ;
+N+Prop:%:   Cases  ;
+N+Prop:%:   Cases  ;
+N+Prop:%:   Cases  ;
+N+Prop:%:   Cases  ;
+N+Prop:%:   Cases  ;
!        -    Nouns  ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
