src/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
!! Proper nouns
!! -----
!! Proper nouns in the Estonian language are things.

LEXICON propernouns
Tartu:Tartu    Prop-tartu   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
